Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Parks and Recreation  Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $9,070,940 for
debt service.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 1,002,981
(2) Central services ........................ $ 25,144,237
(3) Parks development.................... $ 21,443,124
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 81,439,266
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 29,996,314
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Parks and  Natural Resources Fund to
the State Parks and Recreation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 1,629,136
(2) Central services ........................ $ 21,952,280
(3) Parks development.................... $ 16,930,439
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 65,667,358
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 52,910,422
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,145,780 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Parks and Recreation Department for  the payment
of debt service.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5527 (SB 5527-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation De-
partment for the following purposes:
(1) Parks development.................... $ 1,989,320
(2) Direct services .......................... $ 2,467,099
(3) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 17,293,728
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5527 (SB 5527-A) Page 2